District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.24

Political participation in certain elections first held under this chapter.

(a)

In order to provide continuity in the government of the District of Columbia during the transition from the appointed government to the elected government provided for under this chapter, no person employed by the United States or by the government of the District of Columbia shall be prohibited by reason of such employment:

(1)

From being a candidate in the first primary election and general election held under this chapter for the office of Mayor or Chairman or member of the Council of the District of Columbia provided for under subchapter IV; and

(2)

If such a candidate, from taking an active part in political management or political campaigns in any election referred to in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(b)

Such candidacy shall be deemed to have commenced on the day such person obtains from the Board of Elections an official nominating petition with his name stamped thereon, and shall terminate:

(1)

In the case of such candidate who ceases to be eligible as a nominee for the office with respect to which such petition was obtained by reason of his inability or failure to qualify as a bona fide nominee prior to the expiration of the final date for filing such petition under the election laws of the District of Columbia, on the day following such expiration date;

(2)

In the case of such candidate who is elected to any such office with respect to which such nominating petition was obtained, on the day such candidate takes office following the election held with respect thereto;

(3)

In the case of such candidate who is defeated in a primary election held to nominate candidates for the office with respect to which such nominating petition was obtained, on the expiration of the thirty-day period following the date of such primary election; and

(4)

In the case of such candidate who fails to be elected in a general election to any such office with respect to which such nominating petition was obtained, on the expiration of the thirty-day period following the date of such election.

(c)

The provisions of this section shall terminate as of January 2, 1975.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 724
as added April 17, 1974, 88 Stat. 85, Pub. L. 93-268, § 3